Utah statutes.
73-23-2.   Appropriation -- Projects authorized.

(1)  There is appropriated from the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund $30,000,000 to the following agencies for fiscal year 1985-86 to pay all or any portion of any of the following projects, including but not limited to:

(a)  To the Division of Water Resources to pay for all or any

portion of the West Desert Pumping Project, Bare Bones

West Desert Pumping	$60,000,000

(b)  To the Disaster Relief Board for allocation to the appropriate

entities to pay for all or any portion of any diking or other flood

damage or mitigation costs as determined by the board with the

concurrence of the governor, including, but not limited to:

implementing the finger diking project in Salt Lake County,

raising the breakwaters around the Great Salt Lake Marina and

diking the east side of the parking lot, raising the AMAX North

dike to protect I-80, raising the American Salt Company dike,

raising the South Davis WWTP - North Plant dikes, diking the

Little Mountain WWTP, and diking the Corinne Sewage Lagoon	$10,000,000

(c)  To the Division of Water Resources for preconstruction design

studies for a state water plan for upstream water development	$500,000

(d)  To the Division of Water Resources to pay for the engineering

and design work for the interisland diking projects (diking from

Antelope Island to Fremont Island and from Fremont Island to

Promontory Point) by July 1, 1987.	$1,200,000

(2)  All money provided under this chapter shall be nonlapsing and may be used for all acquisitions and construction costs, including, without exclusion or limitation, operation and maintenance, the cost of acquiring land, interests in land, easements and rights-of-way, the cost of improving sites, and of acquiring, constructing, equipping, and furnishing facilities and all structures, roads, utilities, and improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient to the facilities and all related engineering, architectural, and legal fees.



Enacted by Chapter 6, 1986 Special Session 2

